test/src/morphology/N-reboi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - reboi: # Noun 'fox / kettu' - full paradigm
     reboi+N+Sg+Nom: reboi
     reboi+N+Sg+Gen: reboin
     reboi+N+Sg+Acc: [reboi, reboin]
     reboi+N+Sg+Par: reboidu
     reboi+N+Sg+Tra: reboikse
     reboi+N+Sg+Abe: [reboitta, reboita, reboittah]
     reboi+N+Sg+Com: reboinke
     reboi+N+Sg+Ine: rebois
     reboi+N+Sg+Ela: [reboispäi, rebois]
     reboi+N+Sg+Ill: reboih
     reboi+N+Sg+Ade: reboil
     reboi+N+Sg+Abl: [reboilpäi, reboil]
     reboi+N+Sg+All: reboile
     reboi+N+Sg+Ess: reboinnu
     reboi+N+Sg+Ter: reboissah
     reboi+N+Sg+Apr: reboilluo
     reboi+N+Pl+Nom: reboit
     reboi+N+Pl+Gen: reboloin
     reboi+N+Pl+Acc: reboit
     reboi+N+Pl+Par: reboloi
     reboi+N+Pl+Tra: reboloikse
     reboi+N+Pl+Abe: [reboloitta, reboloita, reboloittah]
     reboi+N+Pl+Com: reboloinke
     reboi+N+Pl+Ine: rebolois
     reboi+N+Pl+Ela: [reboloispäi, rebolois]
     reboi+N+Pl+Ill: reboloihe
     reboi+N+Pl+Ade: reboloil
     reboi+N+Pl+Abl: [reboloilpäi, reboloil]
     reboi+N+Pl+All: reboloile
     reboi+N+Pl+Ess: reboloinnu
     reboi+N+Pl+Ins: reboloin
     reboi+N+Pl+Apr: reboloilluo
     reboi+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: reboigi
     reboi+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: reboingi
     reboi+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [reboigi, reboingi]
     reboi+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: reboidugi
     reboi+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: reboiksegi
     reboi+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [reboittagi, reboitagi, reboittahgi]
     reboi+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: reboinkegi
     reboi+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: reboisgi
     reboi+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [reboispäigi, reboisgi]
     reboi+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: reboihgi
     reboi+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: reboilgi
     reboi+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [reboilpäigi, reboilgi]
     reboi+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: reboilegi
     reboi+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: reboinnugi
     reboi+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: reboissahgi
     reboi+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: reboilluogi
     reboi+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: reboitgi
     reboi+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: reboloingi
     reboi+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: reboitgi
     reboi+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: reboloigi
     reboi+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: reboloiksegi
     reboi+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [reboloittagi, reboloitagi, reboloittahgi]
     reboi+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: reboloinkegi
     reboi+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: reboloisgi
     reboi+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [reboloispäigi, reboloisgi]
     reboi+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: reboloihegi
     reboi+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: reboloilgi
     reboi+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [reboloilpäigi, reboloilgi]
     reboi+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: reboloilegi
     reboi+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: reboloinnugi
     reboi+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: reboloingi
     reboi+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: reboloilluogi
